New Jersey, session 221, S317.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 2 of P.L.1984, c.203 (C.45:9-37.36) is amended to read as follows: 2.    As used in this act: a.     "Advisory committee" means the Athletic Training Advisory Committee established in section 5 of P.L.1984, c.203 (C.45:9-37.39); b.    ["Athlete" means an individual who participates in strenuous physical exercise, physical conditioning, or a sport;] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.    , c.   ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) c.     "Athletic trainer" means a person who practices athletic training; d.    "Athletic training" means and includes [the practice of physical conditioning and reconditioning of athletes and the prevention of injuries incurred by athletes] but is not limited to: the treatment of an individual for injury prevention and health management; the clinical evaluation and assessment of an individual for an injury or illness, or both; and the rehabilitation and reconditioning of an individuals injury or illness, or both, as recommended by the advisory committee and defined in regulations by the board.  Athletic training shall also include the application of physical treatment modalities to athletes under a plan of care designed and overseen by a physician licensed in this State, as recommended by the advisory committee and defined in regulations by the board; e.     "Board" means the State Board of Medical Examiners; f.     "Supervision" means that a physician licensed in this State is accessible to an athletic trainer, either on-site [or through] , by voice, or electronic communication, during athletic training. (cf: P.L.2007, c.323, s.1) 2.    Section 3 of P.L.1984, c.203 (C.45:9-37.37) is amended to read as follows: 3.    a.  No person shall practice or hold himself out as being able to practice athletic training in this State unless licensed in accordance with the provisions of P.L.1984, c.203 (C.45:9-37.35 et seq.). b.    [A licensed athletic trainer may provide athletic training only: (1)   (a)  to athletes engaged in interscholastic, intercollegiate, or intramural athletic activities which are being conducted by an educational institution licensed in this State; or (b) to professional athletes; or (2)   to athletes in any setting when the athletic trainer is under the supervision of a physician licensed in this State] Nothing in P.L.1984, c.203 (C.45:9-37.35 et seq.) shall be construed to authorize the interpretation of data for the purpose of diagnosing disease, organic condition or the practice of medicine and surgery, chiropractic, podiatry, occupational therapy, physical therapy, or prosthetics by a person who is not licensed to practice as such pursuant to Title 45 of the Revised Statutes. c.     An athletic trainer shall immediately refer an [athlete] individual to an appropriate health care professional licensed in this State if the athletic trainer has reasonable cause to believe that athletic training is contraindicated or symptoms or conditions are present that require services outside the scope of an athletic trainer's practice. (cf: P.L.2007, c.323, s.2) 3.    Section 6 of P.L.1984, c.203 (C.45:9-37.40) is amended to read as follows: 6.    a.  Beginning on the effective date of P.L.2001, c.156, it shall be unlawful for any person, other than an athletic trainer licensed pursuant to P.L.1984, c.203 (C.45:9-37.35 et seq.) to practice athletic training in this State unless licensed in accordance with the provisions of this act. Nothing in this act, however, shall prohibit any person licensed to practice in this State under any other law from engaging in the practice for which he is licensed. b.    This act shall not prohibit: a candidate for licensure as an athletic trainer from accumulating the mandated number of hours of supervised clinical experience under the direction of a licensed athletic trainer; a student enrolled in a school or educational program of athletic training approved by the board from performing acts of athletic training incidental to the course of study, if the performance is under the direction of a licensed athletic trainer; a student in any educational program in the healing arts approved or accredited under the laws of this State from carrying out prescribed courses of study; a person employed by any agency, bureau or division of the federal government from discharging his official duties; or a person in connection with employment as an athletic trainer by a nonresident [athlete] individual, educational institution or recognized athletic organization temporarily visiting in this State, from practicing athletic training for a period not to exceed 90 days in one calendar year provided he is lawfully permitted to work as an athletic trainer in the state of residence of his employer. c.     The provisions of this act are not intended to limit the activities of persons legitimately engaged in the administration of nontherapeutic baths, massage and normal exercise. (cf: P.L.2007, c.323, s.4) 4.    Section 10 of P.L.1984, c.203 (C.45:9-37.44) is amended to read as follows: 10.  a.  On payment to the board of the application fee as provided in section 14 of [this act] P.L.1984, c.203 (C.45:9-37.48), and upon approval of the application, the board shall issue a license to any person who successfully passes the examination provided in section 9 of [this act] P.L.1984, c.203 (C.45:9-37.43). b.    The licensee shall display, or carry on the licensees person if displaying is not possible, a practicing license at any place the licensee renders services. c.     Any license displayed pursuant to subsection b. of this section may be displayed in a manner which prevents the public display of the licensees home address, provided that the license is not permanently defaced or altered, and the license and all the information contained thereon, including the address of record, can be presented upon the request of a person conducting an investigation. (cf: P.L.2001, c.156, s.7) 5.    Section 7 of P.L.1984, c.203 (C.45:9-37.41) is repealed. 6.    This act shall take effect immediately.